Washington statutes.
RCW 39.76.030

Penalties by state agencies to be paid from administrative funds.

Any state agency required to pay late payment penalties under this chapter shall pay the penalties from funds designated for administrative costs of the agency receiving the public works, personal services, goods and services, equipment, or travel and shall not be paid from funds appropriated for client services.

[ 1981 c 68 s 3.]